Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 50

Claims Against Estates

28-50-101. Limitations on filing of claims.

(a)

Statute of Nonclaim.

Statute of Limitations.No claim shall be allowed which was barred by any statute of limitations at the time of the decedent's death.

(f)

Certain Tort Claims Not Affected.

Extension of Limitation to Certain Cases.Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions relating to the time for filing claims against an estate, or any other provisions of the Probate Code, a creditor of an estate who receives service of notice from the personal representative in accordance with §28-40-111(a)(4), within thirty (30) days of the expiration of the nonclaim period, shall have an additional thirty (30) days after the expiration of the nonclaim period in which to present or file its claim.

Claims of Known or Reasonably Ascertainable Creditors Barred.Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section to the contrary, the claims of all known or reasonably ascertainable creditors shall be barred at the end of two (2) years from date of first publication of notice to creditors, even if they have not been provided actual notice in accordance with §28-40-111(a)(4).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 110; 1971, No. 385, § 1; 1985, No. 1007, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2601; Acts 1989, No. 929, § 2; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 59, § 2; 2007, No. 231, § 1; 2009, No. 217, § 2.

28-50-102. Commencement or revival of actions.

The provisions of §28-50-101 shall not preclude the commencement or continuance of separate actions against the personal representative as such for the debts and other liabilities of the decedent, if commenced or revived within the periods stated in §28-50-101.

Any action pending against any person at the time of his or her death, which survives against the personal representative, shall be considered a claim duly filed against the estate from the time the action is revived, and any action commenced against a personal representative as such after the death of the decedent shall be considered a claim duly filed against the estate from the time such an action is commenced, if, within the time required by §28-50-101 for filing claims against the estate, the plaintiff in the action files with the circuit court in which the estate is being administered a copy of the petition for revivor or of the complaint or a statement signed by the plaintiff or his or her attorney setting forth a description of the nature of the action, the claim, or demand involved, the parties to the action, and the court in which the action is pending.

Nothing in this section shall impair the individual liability of the personal representative for his or her own acts and contracts in the administration of the estate.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 111; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2602.

28-50-103. Form and verification of claims.

No claim shall be allowed against an estate on application of the claimant unless it shall be in writing, describe the nature and the amount of the claim, if ascertainable, and be accompanied by the affidavit of the claimant or someone for him or her that the amount is justly due or, if not yet due, when it will or may become due, that no payments have been made on the claim which are not credited, and that there are no offsets to the claim, to the knowledge of the affiant, except as stated in the claim.

If the claim is contingent, the nature of the contingency shall be stated also.

If the claim has been assigned after the death of the decedent, the affidavit required in this section shall be made by or on behalf of the person owning the claim at the date of death of the decedent and by or on behalf of the assignee.

If a claim is founded on a written instrument, the original or a copy thereof with all endorsements must be attached to the claim.

The original instrument must be exhibited to the personal representative or court, upon demand, unless it is lost or destroyed, in which case its loss or destruction must be stated in the claim.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 112; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2603.

28-50-104. Presentation and filing of claims.

(1)A person having a claim against an estate may present it to the personal representative, properly verified, for approval.

The personal representative shall endorse upon the claim the date of the presentation to him or her, his or her approval or disapproval of the claim, and, if approved, the classification of the claim, and he or she shall sign the endorsement.

As an alternative to the procedure set forth in subsection (a) of this section, a person having a claim against an estate may file it with the court, whereupon the clerk shall notify the personal representative, by ordinary mail, of the filing of the claim.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 113; 1967, No. 287, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2604.

28-50-105. Allowance of claims.

(1)Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, no claimant shall be entitled to payment unless his or her claim shall have been duly filed with and allowed by the court.

Except in the case of the personal representative's own claim, any claim which is approved by him or her in writing and which has been duly filed may be allowed by the court at any time without formal hearing.

A claim which has been disapproved or not acted upon by the personal representative shall be set by rule or order of the court for a hearing on a day certain, and notice of the hearing shall be given by the clerk to the personal representative, to the claimant, and to other persons, if any, as the court may direct.

Upon the adjudication of a claim, the court shall allow it in whole or in part and classify it or disallow it.

Claims for expenses of administration may be allowed upon application of the claimant or of the personal representative, or may be allowed at any accounting, regardless of whether or not they have been paid by the personal representative.

(1)Notwithstanding the provisions of §28-50-103, the personal representative may pay reasonable funeral expenses and reasonable medical and other expenses incident to the last illness, as well as claims amounting in aggregate to three thousand dollars ($3,000) or less, no one (1) of which shall exceed the sum of three hundred dollars ($300), and he or she may take credit in his or her settlement.

However, the burden shall be upon the personal representative, at the request of an interested person, to establish the validity of any such claim paid under this subsection.

Objection to any payment made under this subsection shall be made within the time provided by the Probate Code for filing exceptions to the settlement and not thereafter.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 114; 1967, No. 287, §§ 10, 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2605; Acts 1987, No. 907, § 1.

28-50-106. Classification and payment of claims.

At the time of their allowance, all claims shall be classified in one (1) of the following classes, and, if the applicable assets of the estate are insufficient to pay all claims, the personal representative shall make payment in the following order:

Costs and expenses of administration;

Reasonable funeral expenses, reasonable medical and other expenses incident to the last illness, and wages of employees of the decedent;

Claims based on a liability of the decedent for any state tax debt assessed against the decedent, or due at the time of his or her death, or due from the decedent's estate as a result of his or her death; and

All other claims allowed.

No preference shall be given in the payment of any claim over any other claim of the same class, nor shall a claim due and payable be entitled to a preference over claims not due.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 115; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2606; Acts 1995, No. 391, § 1.

28-50-107. Claims of personal representative.

A personal representative may establish a claim he or she may have against the estate by filing the claim with the court. Upon a hearing after such notice as it shall direct and if satisfied as to the validity of the claim, the court shall enter an order allowing it.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 116; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2607.

28-50-108. Claims not due.

Upon proof of a claim which will become due at some future time, the amount of which is capable of ascertainment, the court shall allow it at the present value of the claim, and payment may be made as in the case of an absolute claim which has been allowed.

However, if the obligation upon which the claim was founded was entered into before July 1, 1949, payment may be made as provided in subsection (a) of this section if the creditor agrees thereto. Otherwise, the court may order the personal representative to retain in his or her hands sufficient funds to satisfy the claim upon maturity, or, if the distributees shall give a bond acceptable to the creditor and approved by the court for the payment of the creditor's claim in accordance with the terms thereof, the court may order the bond to be given in satisfaction of the claim and the estate may be closed.

Where a husband dies and a divorced wife is entitled to alimony payments for the rest of her life from his estate, a court does not err in refusing to commute the wife's claim to its present value. Powell v. Pearson, 251 Ark. 1107, 476 S.W.2d 802 (1972).

Subject to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a secured claim may be presented, filed, and allowed in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as an unsecured claim.

An order allowing a secured claim shall identify it as such and shall describe the security, either in detail or by reference to a recorded instrument in which a detailed description may be found.

Payment of a secured claim, after allowance, shall be made only as follows:

If the creditor surrenders all of his or her security to the personal representative, then upon the basis of the full amount thereof, as an unsecured claim;

If the creditor, proceeding with due diligence and in a manner provided by law, liquidates and applies to the payment of his or her claim the proceeds of all or a part of his or her security and surrenders to the personal representative any part not so liquidated and applied, then upon the basis of the balance of the claim remaining unpaid, as an unsecured claim;

If the secured creditor fails to surrender his or her security as provided in subdivision (e)(1) of this section, or to initiate proceedings as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, within sixty (60) days after the expiration of the period for filing claims against the estate, or within such additional time as the court by order may prescribe, or before the filing of a final settlement by the personal representative if it is filed after the expiration of the sixty-day period, he or she shall be deemed to have elected to waive his or her claim against the estate and shall have recourse only against his or her security for the payment of the debt secured thereby;

If the obligation constituting the basis of a secured claim which has been allowed is not due, then the court, after a hearing on a petition filed by an interested person if it is found for the best interest of the estate and not injurious to the creditors, may order an acceleration of maturity of the obligation, but only by consent of the creditor if the obligation was incurred prior to July 1, 1949, and shall determine the present value of the claim as provided in § 28-50-108; and

After allowance of a secured claim based upon an obligation which is due under the provisions of the contract or which has become due by order of the court as authorized in subdivision (e)(4) of this section, if the creditor has not proceeded as authorized in subdivision (e)(1) or (e)(2) of this section, upon petition of an interested person and after due hearing if found for the best interest of the estate or required for the protection of unsecured creditors the court may:

Order the property constituting the security to be sold free of the lien of the secured creditor, subject to the provisions of § 28-51-107;

Order the sale of the decedent's title to or equity of redemption in the property subject to the lien or title held by the secured creditor; or

Order the personal representative to abandon the property as of no value to the estate, without prejudice to dower or homestead rights or to the rights of the distributees. If the property is ordered sold free of the lien, the proceeds shall be applied first to the payment of costs incident to the sale, and next to the payment of the secured claim, and the balance, if any, shall be paid to the personal representative.

This section shall not apply to contingent claims except as to security given by the decedent to the creditor holding the contingent claim.

Where mortgagor dies insolvent, the probate court might have ordered the property sold free of the mortgagee's lien by giving him a preferred claim against the proceeds of the sale, but no attempt was made to follow this procedure. Purchaser was not entitled to take the land free of the mortgage, as a bona fide purchaser, as the court can offer at a judicial sale only such title as is held by the person or estate whose interest is being sold. Jones v. Nix, 232 Ark. 182, 334 S.W.2d 891 (1960).

Cited: Woods v. Barber, 255 Ark. 927, 504 S.W.2d 355 (1974).

As early as Walker v. Byers, 14 Ark. 246 (1853), the Supreme Court held that there was no requirement to file a contingent claim against an estate upon the claim becoming absolute subsequent to the termination of the estate the court held that the creditor could pursue the distributees to the extent of the property received by them. Hall v. Cole, 71 Ark. 601, 76 S.W. 1076 (1903), and Planters' Mut. Ins. Ass'n v. Nelson, 80 Ark. 103, 96 S.W. 123 (1906), also state the rule that equity will enforce contribution out of lands held by the heirs in an action by a contingent creditor whose claim had matured. Numerous decisions of the Supreme Court hold that a contingent creditor may obtain satisfaction out of assets passing to the distributee and remaining in his hands, and several cases specifically hold that the property passing into the hands of an innocent purchaser cannot be reached by the creditor (Wallace v. Swepston, 74 Ark. 520, 86 S.W. 398 (1905)) (decisions under prior law).

A contingent claim which does not become absolute until a ruling of a court and when filed within six months after becoming absolute is not barred because not filed within the time required by §28-50-101. Whitener v. Whitener, 227 Ark. 1038, 304 S.W.2d 260 (1957).

A contingent claim against an estate which becomes absolute six months prior to the final order of distribution must be filed within six months after becoming absolute or it is unenforceable. Huff v. Bruce, 261 Ark. 498, 549 S.W.2d 282 (1977).

Cited: Chamberlain v. Crawford, 236 Ark. 468, 366 S.W.2d 897 (1963).

Ark. L. Rev.

Note, The Requirement of Notice in Probate Proceedings: Recent Changes in Arkansas Law, 43 Ark. L. Rev. 945.

Where the contributory liability of a deceased surety was not incurred before his estate was wound up and land in value exceeding the liability was turned over to his sole devisee, judgment against the devisee would be rendered for the amount of the liability, to be charged as a lien upon the land. Hecht v. Scaggs, 53 Ark. 291, 13 S.W. 930 (1890) (decision under prior law).

While land descended may, in equity, be charged, in the hands of the heirs, with a debt of the intestate which accrued after the administration upon his estate was closed, the title of a bona fide purchaser acquired before the commencement of the suit would be protected. Berton v. Anderson, 56 Ark. 470, 20 S.W. 250 (1892) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 117; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2608.

28-50-109. Secured claims.

If a claim is secured, in whole or in part, the security shall be described in the proof of claim.

Written instruments evidencing the security shall be subject to the provisions of §28-50-103 relative to written instruments upon which a claim is founded. However, if the instrument is recorded in any public record, a duly authenticated copy may be exhibited in lieu of the original.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 118; 1967, No. 287, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2609.

28-50-110. Contingent claims.

(1)Contingent claims which cannot be allowed as absolute debts may, nevertheless, be filed in the court and proved.

If allowed as a contingent claim, the order of allowance shall state the nature of the contingency.

If the claim becomes absolute before distribution of the estate, it shall be paid in the same manner as absolute claims of the same class.

In all other cases, the court may order the personal representative to make distribution of the estate, but to retain in his or her hands sufficient funds to pay the claim if and when the claim becomes absolute. However, for this purpose, the estate shall not be kept open longer than two (2) years after distribution of the remainder of the estate has been made. Prior to or at the expiration of the two-year period, if the claim has not become absolute, the court may order distribution of the funds so retained, after paying any costs and expenses accruing during the period, and the distributees shall be liable to the creditor to the extent of the estate received by them, if the contingent claim thereafter becomes absolute. When distribution is so made, the court may require the distributees to give bond with security for the satisfaction of their liability to the contingent creditor.

A contingent claim which becomes absolute six (6) months or more prior to the order of final distribution shall be presented for allowance within six (6) months after becoming absolute. When allowed, the claim shall be deemed an absolute claim as against assets which have not been distributed or distribution of which has not been approved and shall be entitled to the benefit of the provisions of subsection (c) of this section as to assets which do not remain in the hands or subject to the control of the personal representative.

Contingent claims not presented within the time prescribed by §28-50-101 or subsection (b) of this section shall be barred as against the estate, but, within the time permitted by law for bringing actions thereon, may be enforced against distributees of the estate to the extent of the assets of the estate or the proceeds thereof remaining in the hands of the distributees.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 119; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2610.

28-50-111. Payment of contingent claims by distributees — Contribution.

If a contingent claim shall have been presented and allowed against an estate and all the assets of the estate including the fund, if any, set apart for the payment thereof shall have been distributed, and the claim shall thereafter become absolute, then the creditor shall have the right to recover thereon in a court having equitable jurisdiction against those distributees whose distributive shares have been increased by reason of the fact that the amount of the claim as finally determined was not paid out prior to final distribution, provided an action therefor shall be commenced within the time permitted by law for bringing an action.

The distributees shall be jointly and severally liable, but no distributee shall be liable for an amount exceeding the value of the estate or fund so distributed to him or her.

If more than one (1) distributee is liable to the creditor, he or she shall make all distributees who can be reached by process parties to the action.

(1)By its judgment, the court shall determine the amount of the liability of each of the defendants as between themselves.

However, if any defendant is insolvent or unable to pay his or her proportion, or is beyond the reach of process, the others, to the extent of their respective liabilities, nevertheless shall be liable to the creditor for the whole amount of his or her debt.

If any person liable for the debt fails to pay his or her just proportion to the creditor, he or she shall be liable to indemnify all who, by reason of the failure on his or her part, have paid more than their just proportion of the debt, the indemnity to be recovered in the same action or in separate actions.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 120; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2611.

28-50-112. Compromise of claims.

When a claim against the estate has been filed or suit thereon is pending, if it appears to be in the best interest of the estate and subject to the court's authorization or approval, the creditor and personal representative may compromise the claim whether due or not due, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 121; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2612.

Cross References. Settlement of claims due an estate, §28-49-104.

Partial Acceptance.

Acceptance of part of an amount apportioned did not estop a creditor to collect the balance. Jacoway v. Hall, 67 Ark. 340, 55 S.W. 12 (1900) (decision under prior law).

28-50-113. Payment of claims.

Upon expiration of six (6) months after the date of the first publication of notice to creditors and the final adjudication of all claims filed against the estate, the personal representative shall proceed to pay the claims allowed against the estate in accordance with the provisions of the Probate Code.

If it appears at any time that the estate is or may be insolvent, that there are insufficient funds on hand, or that there is other good and sufficient cause, the personal representative may report that fact to the court and apply for any order that he or she deems necessary in connection therewith.

The court, by order, shall direct the application of the assets of the estate to the payment of claims of the several classes in accordance with the order of priority set forth in § 28-50-106.

If there are sufficient assets to pay part, but not all, of the claims of a single class, the assets applicable thereto shall be apportioned between the claims of the class.

Prior to the expiration of the period of six (6) months, the personal representative shall pay such of the claims as the court shall order, and the court may require bond or security to be given by the creditor to refund such part of the payment as may be necessary to make payment in accordance with the provisions of the Probate Code, but all payments made by the personal representative without order of court shall be at his or her own peril.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Because an estate was insolvent, the probate court correctly ordered the estate assets sold to pay claims and expenses of administration. Acklin v. Riddell, 42 Ark. App. 230, 856 S.W.2d 322 (1993).

Payment of unprobated claims, without an order of a court, was a waste of the assets, for which creditors with probated claims or the administrator in succession could maintain an action against the administrator or executor. Edrington v. Jefferson, 53 Ark. 545, 14 S.W. 99 (1890) (decision under prior law).

Although name on estate accounts suggested a fiduciary character, where accounts were used for business purposes, and other purposes not solely fiduciary, trial court did not err in finding this section inapplicable. Adams v. First State Bank, 300 Ark. 235, 778 S.W.2d 611 (1989).

ALR.

Enforceability of contractual right, in which fiduciary has interest, to purchase property of estate or trust. 6 A.L.R.4th 786.

Am. Jur. 31 Am. Jur. 2d, Exec. & Ad., §§ 178-181 and § 243 et seq.

Ark. L. Rev.

Acts 1949 General Assembly — Act 140 The Probate Code, 3 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

Real Property — Dower — Vesting of Title to Realty in Heirs of Intestate, 6 Ark. L. Rev. 67.

C.J.S. 34 C.J.S., Exec. & Ad., § 295 et seq. and § 785 et seq.

Preambles. Acts 1961, No. 424, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, due to the changed nature of the economy of Arkansas, it is no longer true that real property constitutes the sound core of the assets of most estates; and in many instances the estate of a decedent now includes investments represented by personal property more desirable than certain types of real property to be preserved for distribution to the heirs at law or beneficiaries of the will of the decedent; and by the provisions of the Probate Code it was the intention of the General Assembly of Arkansas of 1949 to give suitable recognition to this change; but it now appears that apparently conflicting provisions in that Code have given rise to ambiguity and uncertainty of interpretation thereof;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 658, § 3: Mar. 22, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law permits the court to allow the personal representative of an estate to extend credit not exceeding one year and for an amount not exceeding seventy-five percent (75%) of the sale price of real and personal property of the estate; that the limitation currently prescribed on the period and amount of the credit that may be allowed on sales of property of an estate are unduly restrictive and make it difficult if not impossible for the personal representative to obtain the best available price for such property; that this Act is designed to authorize the court to permit extension of credit for a period not exceeding ten (10) years and in an amount equal to ninety percent (90%) of the purchase price of the property and should be given effect immediately in order to enable personal representatives to obtain the best available price for real and personal property of an estate. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

The provision of this section abolishing the priority between real and personal property for payment of the debts of the deceased only applies after it has been determined that the lands are necessary for the payment of debts. Cranna v. Long, 225 Ark. 153, 279 S.W.2d 828 (1955); Whitener v. Whitener, 227 Ark. 1038, 304 S.W.2d 260 (1957).

An administrator had no control of the lands of an estate except for the payment of debts. Stuckey v. Stephens, 115 Ark. 572, 171 S.W. 908 (1914) (decision under prior law).

An executor could maintain ejectment for a testator's land when necessary to pay debts of the estate. Etchison v. Dail, 182 Ark. 350, 31 S.W.2d 426 (1930) (decision under prior law).

The charge upon real estate of a decedent for the payment of his debts was held not perpetual, and an application to sell the lands had to be made in a reasonable time, to be determined by the court under the circumstances of the case. A delay of ten years after the grant of administration, without showing any hindrance or proper cause for it, was unreasonable and discharged the lien upon real estate. Mays v. Rogers, 37 Ark. 155 (1881); Stewart v. Smiley, 46 Ark. 373 (1885) (decisions under prior law).

Under former statute, a delay of seven years was held to be too long. Brogan v. Brogan, 63 Ark. 405, 39 S.W. 58 (1897); Black v. Robinson, 70 Ark. 185, 68 S.W. 489 (1902) (decisions under prior law).

The presumption was that the lands were sold to pay the debts of the intestate duly probated against the estate, and an unlawful sale would not be presumed. Shell v. Young, 78 Ark. 479, 95 S.W. 798 (1906) (decision under prior law).

Lands were assets in hands of an administrator only when personalty was insufficient to pay debts. Doke v. Benton County Lumber Co., 114 Ark. 1, 169 S.W. 327 (1914) (decision under prior law).

An administrator could not sue to establish title to and recover possession of land without a showing that the land was needed to pay debts. Miller v. Watkins, 169 Ark. 60, 272 S.W. 846 (1925) (decision under prior law).

During pendency of administration, heirs could not recover lands from tenants while debts were unpaid. Hopson v. Oxford, 72 Ark. 272, 79 S.W. 1051 (1904) (decision under prior law).

The heirs had the right to the real property of an estate unless and until it was necessary to apply it to the payment of debts of the intestate, and it was not within the province of an administrator to construct or complete buildings at the expense of the real estate for which mechanic's liens could be fixed and enforced against it. Doke v. Benton County Lumber Co., 114 Ark. 1, 169 S.W. 327 (1914) (decision under prior law).

A creditor was entitled to a sale of real estate to pay debt where the administrator testified at a hearing that he had taken charge of no personal property and had never heard that the decedent had any personal property, as the testimony justified a finding of no personal property in the estate. Regional Agrl. Credit Corp. v. Polk, 214 Ark. 285, 215 S.W.2d 523 (1948) (decision under prior law).

This section does not change the rule that the legal title to an intestate's land upon his death descends and vests in his heirs at law, subject to the widow's dower and the payment of debts through his administrator. Cranna v. Long, 225 Ark. 153, 279 S.W.2d 828 (1955).

Cited: Estate of Knott v. Jones, 14 Ark. App. 271, 687 S.W.2d 529 (1985).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 122; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2613.

28-50-114. Execution and levies prohibited.

No execution shall issue upon nor shall any levy be made against any property of the estate under any judgment against a decedent or a personal representative.

However, the provisions of this section shall not be construed to prevent the enforcement of mortgages, pledges, or liens upon real or personal property in an appropriate proceeding.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 123; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2614.